Utah statutes.
73-18a-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board" means the Board of Parks and Recreation.

(2)  "Division" means the Division of Parks and Recreation.

(3)  "Human body waste" means excrement, feces, or other waste material discharged from the human body.

(4)  "Litter" means any bottles, glass, crockery, cans, scrap metal, junk, paper, garbage, rubbish, or similar refuse discarded as no longer useful.

(5)  "Marine toilet" means any toilet or other receptacle permanently installed on or within any vessel for the purpose of receiving human body waste.  This term does not include portable toilets which may be removed from a vessel in order to empty its contents.

(6)  "Operate" means to navigate, control, or otherwise use a vessel.

(7)  "Operator" means the person who is in control of a vessel while it is in use.

(8)  "Owner" means a person, other than a lien holder, holding a proprietary interest in or the title to a vessel.  The term does not include a lessee under a lease not intended as security.

(9)  "Vessel" means every type of watercraft, other than a seaplane on the water, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water.

(10)  "Waters of this state" means all waters within the territorial limits of this state except those used exclusively for private purposes.



Amended by Chapter 197, 1986 General Session

